src/morphology/roots/51.lexc
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'piika][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:vanhoiksi{#}piioiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'piika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:vanhatta{#}piiatta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'piika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:vanhalta{#}piialta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'piika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:vanhalla{#}piialla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'piika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:vanhalle{#}piialle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'piika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:vanhasta{#}piiasta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'piika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:vanhana{#}piikana Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'piika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:vanhan{#}piian Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'piika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:vanhassa{#}piiassa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'piika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ILL]:vanhaan{#}piikaan Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'piika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:vanha{#}piika Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'piika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:vanhaa{#}piikaa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'piika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:vanhaksi{#}piiakse Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'piika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:vanhaksi{#}piiaksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][CASE=CMT]:vanhoine{#}poikine Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:vanhoitta{#}pojitta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:vanhoilta{#}pojilta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:vanhoilla{#}pojilla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:vanhoille{#}pojille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:vanhoista{#}pojista Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:vanhoina{#}poikina Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:vanhojen{#}poikien Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:vanhoissa{#}pojissa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:vanhat{#}pojat Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:vanhoja{#}poikia Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:vanhoiksi{#}pojikse Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:vanhoiksi{#}pojiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:vanhatta{#}pojatta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:vanhalta{#}pojalta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:vanhalla{#}pojalla Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:vanhalle{#}pojalle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:vanhasta{#}pojasta Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:vanhana{#}poikana Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:vanhan{#}pojan Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:vanhassa{#}pojassa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:vanha{#}poika Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:vanhaa{#}poikaa Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:vanhaksi{#}pojakse Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vanha'|'poika][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:vanhaksi{#}pojaksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][CASE=CMT]:vieraine{#}miehine Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABE]:vieraitta{#}miehittä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ABL]:vierailta{#}miehiltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ADE]:vierailla{#}miehillä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ALL]:vieraille{#}miehille Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ELA]:vieraista{#}miehistä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=ESS]:vieraina{#}miehinä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=GEN]:vieraiden{#}miesten Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=INE]:vieraissa{#}miehissä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=NOM]:vieraat{#}miehet Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=PAR]:vieraita{#}miehiä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:vieraiksi{#}miehikse Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=PL][CASE=TRA]:vieraiksi{#}miehiksi Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABE]:vieraatta{#}miehettä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ABL]:vieraalta{#}mieheltä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ADE]:vieraalla{#}miehellä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ALL]:vieraalle{#}miehelle Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ELA]:vieraasta{#}miehestä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=ESS]:vieraana{#}miehenä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=GEN]:vieraan{#}miehen Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=INE]:vieraassa{#}miehessä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:vieras{#}mies Clitic/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=NOM]:vieras{#}mies Possessive/Optional ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=PAR]:vierasta{#}miestä Possessive/Optional+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:vieraaksi{#}miehekse Possessive/Obligatory+Vn ;
[WORD_ID=vieras'|'mies][POS=NOUN][NUM=SG][CASE=TRA]:vieraaksi{#}mieheksi Clitic/Optional ;
